en: spirit-apple vinegar
pl: ocet spirytusowo-jabłkowy, ocet jabłkowo-spirytusowy

en: tarragon vinegar
da: estragoneddike
de: estragonessig
fi: rakuunaetikka
fr: vinaigre à l'estragon
hr: estragon ocat
it: aceto di dragoncello
sv: dragonvinäger

en: alcohol, Pure alcohol
bg: Алкохол
ca: Alcohol
cs: Alkohol
da: alkohol
de: Alkohol
es: alcohol
fi: alkoholi
fr: alcool, Alcool pur
he: אלכוהול
hr: alkohol, alcohol, alkoholno piće
hu: alkohol
it: Alcol, alcool
ja: アルコール, 酒精
nl: alcohol
pl: Alkohol
pt: Álcool
ro: alcool
ru: Алкоголь
sv: alkohol
tr: alkol

en: ethanol
af: etanol
ak: Nsa
an: Etanol
ar: إيثانول
as: ইথান'ল
az: Etanol
ba: Этанол
be: Этанол
bg: Етанол, етилов алкохол
bn: ইথানল
bo: ཨ་རག་ཉིང་ཁུ།
br: Etanol
bs: Etanol
ca: Etanol
cs: ethanol
cy: Ethanol
da: Ethanol
de: Ethylalkohol, Ethanol
el: αιθανόλη
eo: etanolo
es: etanol
et: Etanool
eu: etanol
fa: اتانول
fi: etanoli
fr: alcool éthylique, éthanol
fy: Etanol
ga: Eatánól
gl: Etanol
gu: ઇથેનોલ
he: אתנול
hi: इथेनॉल
hr: etanol, etilni alkohol
hu: etanol
hy: Էթիլ սպիրտ
id: Etanol
is: Etanól
it: alcol etilico, etanolo
ja: エタノール
jv: Etanol
ka: ეთანოლამიდი
kk: Этил спирті
ko: 에탄올
la: Ethanol
lb: Ethanol
mk: етанол
ml: എഥനോൾ
mn: Этанол
mr: इथेनॉल
ms: Etanol
my: အီသနောလ်
nb: etanol
ne: इथानोल
nl: ethylalcohol, ethanol
nn: etanol
oc: etanòl
pa: ਈਥੇਨੋਲ
pl: etanol, alkohol etylowy, alkoholu etylowego
ps: اتانول
pt: etanol
qu: Ethanul
ro: etanol, alcool etilic
ru: этанол, спирт этиловый ректификованный из пищевого сырья, спирт этиловый
sh: Alkohol
si: එතනෝල්
sk: Etanol
sl: Etanol
sq: Etanoli
sr: етанол
sv: Etanol
sw: Ethanoli
ta: எத்தனால்
te: ఇతనోల్
tg: Итонул
th: เอทานอล
tr: Etanol
tt: Этанол
uk: етанол
ur: ایتھنول
uz: Etanol
vi: êtanol
yi: עטאנאל
zh: 乙醇

en: rectified spirit
hr: ispravljeni duh
it: spirito rettificato
pl: spirytus

en: liqueur
af: Likeur
ar: ليكير
az: Likör
be: Лікёр
bg: Ликьор
bs: Liker
ca: licor
cs: likér
cy: Gwirodlyn
da: likør
de: Likör
el: λικέρ
eo: likvoro
es: licor
et: liköör
eu: likore
fa: لیکور
fi: likööri
fr: liqueur
ga: Licéar
gl: Licor
he: ליקר
hi: शराब्
hr: liker
hu: likőr
hy: Լիկյոր
id: Likeur
io: liquoro
it: liquore
ja: リキュール
ka: ლიქიორი
kk: Ликёр
kn: ಮದ್ಯ
ko: 리큐어
ky: Ликер
la: anisatum
lt: likeris
lv: liķieris
mk: Ликер
nb: likør
nl: likeur
nn: likør
oc: Liquor
pl: likier
pt: licor
ro: Lichior
ru: ликёр
sa: मद्य
sc: Licòri
sh: Liker
sk: likér
sl: Liker
sr: ликер
sv: likör
tr: likör
uk: лікер
uz: Likyor
vi: rượu mùi
yi: ליקער
zh: 力娇酒

en: chocolate liqueur
bg: шоколадов ликьор
de: Schokoladenlikör
es: licor de chocolate
fi: suklaalikööri
fr: liqueur de chocolat
he: ליקר שוקולד
hr: čokoladni liker
hu: csokoládélikőr
it: liquore al cioccolato
nl: chocoladelikeur

en: advocaat
xx: Advocaat
de: Eierlikör

en: amaretto
xx: amaretto
be: амарэта
bg: амарето
de: Amaretto, Amarettolikor
he: אמרטו
ja: アマレット
kk: амаретто
ko: 아마레토
la: amarettus
lt: amaretas
nl: amaretto, amaretto likeur
ru: амаретто
uk: амарето
zh: 意大利苦杏酒

en: limoncello
xx: limoncello
bg: лимончело
de: Limoncello
hr: limunčelo
ja: リモンチェッロ
ko: 리몬첼로
lt: limončelas
ru: лимончелло
zh: 檸檬酒

en: Pelinkovac
hr: pelinkovac
it: Pelinkovac
ja: ペリンコバクlt
lt: Pelinkovacas
mk: Пелинковец
ru: Пелинковац
sr: Пелинковац

en: Maraschino
ba: Мараскин
be: Мараскіна
ca: Marrasquino
de: Maraschino
es: Marrasquino
eu: Marraskino
fa: ماراسکینو
fi: Maraschinolikööri
fr: Marasquin, maraschino, marrasquino, maraskino
hr: maraschino, Maraskino
hy: Մարասկինո
io: Maraskino
it: Maraschino
ja: マラスキーノ
ka: მარასკინო
ko: 마라스키노
nl: Maraskino
pl: Maraskino
pt: Marasquino
ru: Мараскин
sh: Maraschino
sv: Maraschino
uk: Мараскіно

en: gin
ar: جن
be: Джын
bg: Джин
ca: ginebra
cs: gin
cv: Джин
cy: Jin
da: gin
de: Gin
el: Τζιν
eo: ĝino
es: ginebra
et: Džinn
eu: gin
fa: جین
fi: gini
fo: Ginn
fr: gin, london-dry-gin
gl: Xenebra
gv: Jeneeve
he: ג'ין
hr: gin
hu: gin
hy: Ջին
id: Gin
io: Jino
is: Gin
it: gin
ja: ジン
ka: ჯინი
kk: Джин
ko: 진
la: Gin
lt: Džinas
lv: džins
mk: Џин
my: ဂျင်
nb: gin
nl: gin
nn: gin
oc: Gin
pl: gin, dżin, ginu, dżinu
pt: gim
ro: Gin
ru: джин
sh: Džin
sk: Gin
sl: Gin
sr: Џин
sv: Gin
ta: ஜின்
th: ยิน
tr: Cin
uk: Джин
vi: Gin
yi: דזשין
zh: 琴酒

en: champagne
an: Champán
ar: شامبانيا
az: Şampan şərabı
be: Шампанскае
bg: Шампанско вино, шампанско
bo: ཤམ་ཕེན་ཆང་།
ca: xampany
cs: šampaňské víno
cv: Шампанское
cy: Siampaen
da: Champagne
de: Champagner
el: Σαμπάνια
eo: Ĉampano
es: champán
et: Šampanja
eu: Xanpaina
fa: شامپاین
fi: Samppanja
fo: Sjampanja
fr: champagne
ga: Seaimpéin
gl: Champaña
gu: શેમ્પેન
he: שמפניה
hr: šampanjac
hu: pezsgő
hy: շամպայն
id: Sampanye
io: Champanio
is: Kampavín
it: champagne
ja: シャンパン
jv: Sampanye
ka: შამპანური
ko: 샴페인
lb: Champagne
lt: Šampanas
lv: šampanietis
mk: Шампањ
ml: ഷാംപെയ്ൻ
mn: Шампанск
nb: champagne
nl: champagne
nn: Champagne
pa: ਸ਼ੈਮਪੇਨ
pl: Szampan, szampana
pt: Champanhe
ro: Șampanie
ru: Шампанское
sh: Šampanjac
sk: Šampanské
sq: Shampanja
sv: Champagne
tr: Şampanya
tt: Шампан
uk: Шампанське
vi: Sâm panh
zh: 香槟酒

en: cava
xx: cava
de: Cava

en: pomace brandy
de: Tresterbrand
fi: pomace brandy, marc
fr: marc
hr: rakija od komine
hu: törkölypárlat
it: Marc, grappa
ja: ポマース・ブランデー
ko: 포도박 브랜디
lb: Trester-Branntewäin
lt: Išspaudų brendis
nb: Marc
nl: Marc
pl: Marc
pt: Bagaceira
sv: Marc

en: Marc de Bourgogne
de: Marc de Bourgogne
fr: marc de bourgogne
hr: marc de bourgogne
it: Marc de Bourgogne

en: Marc de Champagne
de: Marc de Champagne, Marc de Champagner
fi: marc de champagne, marc de champagne -brandy, marc de champagne -brandya
fr: marc de champagne
hr: marc de champagne
it: Marc de Champagne
sv: marc de champagne

en: kirsch
xx: kirsch
be: Кіршвасэр
de: Kirschwasser
eo: kirŝo
fa: کیرش
fi: kirsch, kirsikkaviina
he: קירשווסר
io: Kirsho
ja: キルシュヴァッサー
ko: 키르시바서
nb: Kirschwasser
ru: Киршвассер
sv: kirschwasser
zh: 櫻桃白蘭地

en: tequila
ar: تيكيلا
az: Tekila
be: Тэкіла
bg: Текила
bn: টাকিলা
bs: Tekila
ca: tequila
cs: tequila
cv: Текила
cy: Tekila
da: tequila
de: Tequila
el: Τεκίλα
eo: tekilo
es: tequila
et: tequila
eu: Tekila
fa: تکیلا
fi: tequila
fo: Tequila
fr: tequila
gl: Tequila
he: טקילה
hi: टकीला
hr: tequila
hu: tequila
hy: Տեկիլա
id: Tequila
is: Tekíla
it: tequila
ja: テキーラ
ka: ტეკილა
kk: Текила
km: តេគីឡា
kn: ಟಕಿಲಾ
ko: 테킬라
lb: Tequila
lt: Tekila
lv: Tekila
mk: Текила
ml: ടെക്കീല
nb: Tequila
ne: टेकिला
nl: tequila
oc: Tequila
pl: tequila
pt: tequila
ro: tequila
ru: Текила
si: ටෙකීලා
sl: tequila
sr: Текила
sv: tequila
ta: டெக்கீலா
th: เตกิลา
tr: Tekila
uk: Текіла
vi: Tequila
zh: 龍舌蘭酒